Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-105
Body, defined.

Body means that portion of a vehicle which determines its
shape and appearance and is attached to the frame. Body does not include the box or bed of a truck.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 5;

Laws 2012, LB751, § 6.